Washington statutes.
RCW 35.57.110

Tax on vehicle parking charges.

A public facility district may levy and fix a tax on any vehicle parking charges imposed at any parking facility that is owned or leased by the public facility district as part of a regional center. No county or city or town within which the regional center is located may impose a tax of the same or similar kind on any vehicle parking charges at the facility. For the purposes of this section, "vehicle parking charges" means only the actual parking charges exclusive of taxes and service charges and the value of any other benefit conferred. The tax authorized under this section shall be at the rate of not more than ten percent.

[ 1999 c 165 s 11.]